New York, session 2025-2026, A4654.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. The office of mental health shall conduct a study on 2 utilizing the therapeutic techniques studied by the research and recog- 3 nition project for the treatment of post-traumatic stress disorder. 4 2. Within one year after the effective date of this act, the office of 5 mental health shall prepare and submit to the governor, the temporary 6 president of the senate, the speaker of the assembly, the minority lead- 7 er of the senate and the minority leader of the assembly a report 8 containing the study's findings and recommendations for legislative or 9 administrative action that can be undertaken in utilizing the therapeu- 10 tic techniques studied by the research and recognition project for the 11 treatment of post-traumatic stress disorder. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07532-01-5